Utah statutes.
16-6a-1413.   Appeal from denial of reinstatement.

(1)  If the division denies a nonprofit corporation's application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution under Section 16-6a-1411, the division shall mail to the nonprofit corporation in the manner provided in Subsection 16-6a-1411(5) written notice:

(a)  setting forth the reasons for denying the application; and

(b)  stating that the nonprofit corporation has the right to appeal the division's determination to the executive director as provided in Subsection (2).

(2)  If the division denies a nonprofit corporation's application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, the following may appeal the denial to the executive director:

(a)  the nonprofit corporation for which the reinstatement was requested; or

(b)  the representative of the nonprofit corporation for which reinstatement was requested.

